Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 10. Miner Training.

§ 45.2-579.
First aid training of coal miners.

The Chief shall establish specifications for first aid and refresher training programs for miners at coal mines. Such specifications shall be no less than, but may exceed, the minimum requirements of the training programs that underground and surface coal mine operators are required to provide to their employees pursuant to the federal mine safety law. The Chief may utilize the Department’s educational and training facilities in the conduct of such training programs and may require the cooperation of operators in making such programs available to their employees.

Each operator of a coal mine, upon request, shall make available to every miner employed in such mine the course of first aid training, including refresher training, as is required pursuant to subsection A.

History.

1977, c. 679, § 45.1-101.2; 1978, c. 94; 1984, c. 590; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.101; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-580.
Training programs.

The Department may administer training programs for the purpose of (i) assisting with the provision of selected requirements of the federal mine safety law and (ii) preparing miners for examinations administered by the Board of Coal Mining Examiners. The Director shall establish the curriculum and teaching materials for the training programs, which shall be consistent with the requirements of the federal mine safety law where feasible.

The Department is authorized to charge persons attending the training programs reasonable fees to cover the costs of administering such programs. The Director may exempt certain persons from any required fees for refresher training programs, based on the person’s employment status or such other criteria as the Director deems appropriate. The Director shall not be required to allocate more of the Department’s resources to training programs than are appropriated or otherwise made available for such purpose or are collected from fees charged to attendees.

No miner, operator, or other person shall be required to participate in any training program established under this article. Nothing contained herein shall prevent an operator or any other person from administering a state-approved training program.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.102; 1997, c. 390; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-581.
Additional coal mining training programs.

The Chief may implement a voluntary on-site safety awareness training program for coal miners. Such training may be conducted by a mine inspector in conjunction with his inspection of a coal mine or by other Department personnel. Safety awareness training for coal miners may include such methods as job safety analysis and topical talks on safety issues intended to reduce accidents.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.103; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.